static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N8 Y 197 # склонение "мыш (-к-)"
SFX N8 0 кы .
SFX N8 0 кыд .
SFX N8 0 кыз .
SFX N8 0 кын .
SFX N8 0 кам .
SFX N8 0 кад .
SFX N8 0 каз .
SFX N8 0 камы .
SFX N8 0 кады .
SFX N8 0 казы .
SFX N8 0 кысь .
SFX N8 0 кысьтым .
SFX N8 0 кысьтыд .
SFX N8 0 кысьтыз .
SFX N8 0 кысьтымы .
SFX N8 0 кысьтыды .
SFX N8 0 кысьтызы .
SFX N8 0 кыным .
SFX N8 0 кыныд .
SFX N8 0 кыныз .
SFX N8 0 кынымы .
SFX N8 0 кыныды .
SFX N8 0 кынызы .
SFX N8 0 кысен .
SFX N8 0 кысеным .
SFX N8 0 кысеныд .
SFX N8 0 кысеныз .
SFX N8 0 кысенымы .
SFX N8 0 кысеныды .
SFX N8 0 кысенызы .
SFX N8 0 кытӥ .
SFX N8 0 кытӥм .
SFX N8 0 кытӥд .
SFX N8 0 кытӥз .
SFX N8 0 кытӥмы .
SFX N8 0 кытӥды .
SFX N8 0 кытӥзы .
SFX N8 0 козь .
SFX N8 0 козям .
SFX N8 0 козяд .
SFX N8 0 козяз .
SFX N8 0 козямы .
SFX N8 0 козяды .
SFX N8 0 козязы .
SFX N8 0 лань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лэнлэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лэнлы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лэнэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 лэсьсэ/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ме/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мес/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мылань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мылы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мылэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мылэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мыозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мытэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 мыя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 сы/G1
SFX N8 0 сылань/G1
SFX N8 0 сылы/G1
SFX N8 0 сылэн/G1
SFX N8 0 сылэсь/G1
SFX N8 0 сытэк/G1
SFX N8 0 сыя/G1
SFX N8 0 сэ/G1
SFX N8 0 сэс/G1
SFX N8 0 тӥ/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тӥд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тӥды/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тӥз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тӥзы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тӥм/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тӥмы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ты/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тылань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тылы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тылэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тылэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тытэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тыя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тэ/G1 .
SFX N8 0 тэк/G1 . #лиш.п.
SFX N8 0 тэс/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёс/G1 . # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсад/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсады/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсаз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсазы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсам/G1 . # местн.п. + входн.п
SFX N8 0 ъёсамы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёслань/G1 . # направ.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёслы/G1 . # дат.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёслэн/G1 . # род.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёслэнлэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёслэнлы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёслэсь/G1 . # разд.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсме/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмес/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмылань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмылы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмылэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмылэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмыозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмытэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсмыя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсозь/G1 . # предельн.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсозяд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсозяды/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсозяз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсозязы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсозям/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсозямы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссылань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссылы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссылэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссылэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссыозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссытэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссыя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссэ/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёссэс/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥ/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥды/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥзы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥм/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстӥмы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсты/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстылань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстылы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстылэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстылэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстыозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстытэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстыя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстэ/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёстэк/G1 . # лиш.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёстэс/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсъя/G1 . # соотв.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсы/G1 . # входн.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсыд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдлань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдлы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдлэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдлэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдтэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыдъя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыз/G1 . # вин.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсызлань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсызлы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсызлэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсызлэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсызозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсызтэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсызъя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсылань/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсылы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсылэн/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсылэсь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсын/G1 . # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсынлэсь/G1 . # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсыныд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыныды/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыныз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсынызы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыным/G1 . # твор.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсынымы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыозь/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысен/G1 . # отдал.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсысеныд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысеныды/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысеныз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысенызы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысеным/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысенымы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысь/G1 . # исходн.п.
SFX N8 0 ъёсысьтыд/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысьтыды/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысьтыз/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысьтызы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысьтым/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсысьтымы/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсытэк/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсыя/G1 .
SFX N8 0 ъёсэтӥ/G1 . # перех.п.
SFX N8 0 ъя/G1 . #соотв.п.
