static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
арес/N8N1
вадес/N8N1
урдэс/N8N1A1
нюлэс/N8N1
ёрос/N8N1
кус/N8
вис/N8
мыш/N8
пуш/N8
тыш/N8
пыдтыш/N8
йыртыш/N8
